Illinois, session 104th, HB4706.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Comptroller Act is amended by adding 5Section 23.12 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 405/23.12 new)7    Sec. 23.12. Division of Analytics and Consolidation. 8Subject to appropriation, the Division of Analytics and 9Consolidation is created within the Office of the Comptroller. 10The Division shall conduct research and analyze data necessary 11to identify units of local government and services provided by 12units of local government that should be consolidated. Before 13making a recommendation that a unit of local government or a 14service be consolidated, the Division shall conduct a neutral 15analysis and consider, at a minimum, comparable tax rates, 16geography, service mapping, and cost savings. If the Division 17makes a recommendation that a unit of local government or a 18service should be consolidated, the Division shall submit its 19recommendation to the appropriate unit of local government and 20post the recommendation on the Office of the Comptroller's 21website.